Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-2801
Act, how cited.

Sections 48-2801 to 48-2807 shall be known and may be cited as the Manufacturing Modernization and Workforce Development Pilot Investment Act.

Laws 2025, LB265, § 1.